Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2914
Change of designated office or agent for service of process.

(1) In order to change its registered office, its agent for service of process, or the address of its agent for service of process, a limited cooperative association or a foreign limited cooperative association shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing a statement of change containing:

(a) The name of the limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association;

(b) The street and mailing addresses of its current registered office;

(c) If the current registered office is to be changed, the street and mailing addresses of the new registered office;

(d) The name and street and mailing addresses of its current agent for service of process; and

(e) If the current agent for service of process or an address of the agent is to be changed, the new information.

(2) A statement of change is effective when filed with the Secretary of State.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 14.